Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-204, as
last amended by Section 3, Chapter 308, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 2-204), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-204. The controlled substances listed in this section
are included in Schedule I and include any material, compound,
mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of the following
hallucinogenic substances, their salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers, unless specifically excepted, when the existence of these
salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific
chemical designation.
A. Any of the following opiates including their isomers,
esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers,
unless specifically excepted, when the existence of these isomers,

esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical
designation:
1. Acetylmethadol;
2. Allylprodine;
3. Alphacetylmethadol;
4. Alphameprodine;
5. Alphamethadol;
6. Benzethidine;
7. Betacetylmethadol;
8. Betameprodine;
9. Betamethadol;
10. Betaprodine;
11. Clonitazene;
12. Dextromoramide;
13. Dextrorphan (except its methyl ether);
14. Diampromide;
15. Diethylthiambutene;
16. Dimenoxadol;
17. Dimepheptanol;
18. Dimethylthiambutene;
19. Dioxaphetyl butyrate;
20. Dipipanone;
21. Ethylmethylthiambutene;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 2

22. Etonitazene;
23. Etoxeridine;
24. Furethidine;
25. Hydroxypethidine;
26. Isotonitazene;
27. Ketobemidone;
28. Levomoramide;
29. Levophenacylmorphan;
30. Metonitazene;
31. Morpheridine;
32. N-desethyl isotonitazene;
33. N-pyrrolidino protonitazene;
34. Noracymethadol;
35. Norlevorphanol;
36. Normethadone;
37. Norpipanone;
38. Phenadoxone;
39. Phenampromide;
40. Phenomorphan;
41. Phenoperidine;
42. Piritramide;
43. Proheptazine;
44. Properidine;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 3

45. Protonitazene;
46. Racemoramide; or
47. Trimeperidine.
B. Any of the following opium derivatives, their salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, when
the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
possible within the specific chemical designation:
1. Acetorphine;
2. Acetyldihydrocodeine;
3. Benzylmorphine;
4. Codeine methylbromide;
5. Codeine-N-Oxide;
6. Cyprenorphine;
7. Desomorphine;
8. Dihydromorphine;
9. Etorphine;
10. Heroin;
11. Hydromorphinol;
12. Methyldesorphine;
13. Methylhydromorphine;
14. Morphine methylbromide;
15. Morphine methylsulfonate;
16. Morphine-N-Oxide;
17. Myrophine;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 4

18. Nicocodeine;
19. Nicomorphine;
20. Normorphine;
21. Phoclodine;
22. Thebacon;
23. N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-acetamide
(Acetyl fentanyl);
24. N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-butenamide
(Crotonyl fentanyl);
25. N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-2-
furancarboxamide (Furanyl fentanyl);
26. N-phenyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinamine (4-ANPP);
27. N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
phenylcyclopropanecarboxamide (Cyclopropyl fentanyl); or
28. N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-butanamide
(Butyrl fentanyl).
C. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic substances,
their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically
excepted, when the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
1. Methcathinone;
2. 3, 4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;
3. 3, 4-methylenedioxy methamphetamine;
4. 5-methoxy-3, 4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;
5. 3, 4, 5-trimethoxy amphetamine;
6. Bufotenine;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 5

7. Diethyltryptamine;
8. Dimethyltryptamine;
9. 4-methyl-2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
10. Ibogaine;
11. Lysergic acid diethylamide;
12. Marijuana;
13. Mescaline;
14. N-benzylpiperazine;
15. N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
16. N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
17. Psilocybin;
18. Psilocyn;
19. 2, 5 dimethoxyamphetamine;
20. 4 Bromo-2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
21. 4 methoxyamphetamine;
22. Cyclohexamine;
23. Salvia Divinorum;
24. Salvinorin A;
25. Thiophene Analog of Phencyclidine. Also known as: 1-(1-
(2-thienyl) cyclohexyl) piperidine; 2-Thienyl Analog of
Phencyclidine; TPCP, TCP;
26. Phencyclidine (PCP);
27. Pyrrolidine Analog for Phencyclidine. Also known as 1-(1-
Phenylcyclohexyl) - Pyrrolidine, PCPy, PHP;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 6

28. 1-(3-trifluoromethylphenyl) piperazine;
29. Flunitrazepam;
30. B-hydroxy-amphetamine;
31. B-ketoamphetamine;
32. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-nitroamphetamine;
33. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-bromophenethylamine;
34. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-chlorophenethylamine;
35. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-iodoamphetamine;
36. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-iodophenethylamine;
37. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-methylphenethylamine;
38. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylphenethylamine;
39. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-fluorophenethylamine;
40. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-nitrophenethylamine;
41. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylthio-phenethylamine;
42. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-isopropylthio-phenethylamine;
43. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-propylthio-phenethylamine;
44. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-cyclopropylmethylthio-phenethylamine;
45. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-tert-butylthio-phenethylamine;
46. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(2-fluoroethylthio)-phenethylamine;
47. 5-methoxy-N, N-dimethyltryptamine;
48. N-methyltryptamine;
49. A-ethyltryptamine;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 7

50. A-methyltryptamine;
51. N, N-diethyltryptamine;
52. N, N-diisopropyltryptamine;
53. N, N-dipropyltryptamine;
54. 5-methoxy-a-methyltryptamine;
55. 4-hydroxy-N, N-diethyltryptamine;
56. 4-hydroxy-N, N-diisopropyltryptamine;
57. 5-methoxy-N, N-diisopropyltryptamine;
58. 4-hydroxy-N-isopropyl-N-methyltryptamine;
59. 3,4-Methylenedioxymethcathinone (Methylone);
60. 3,4-Methylenedioxypyrovalerone (MDPV);
61. 3-Methylmethcathinone (Metaphedrone);
62. 4-Methylmethcathinone (Mephedrone);
63. 4-methoxymethcathinone;
64. 4-Fluoromethcathinone;
65. 3-Fluoromethcathinone;
66. 1-(8-bromobenzo 1,2-b;4,5-b’ difuran-4-yl)-2-aminopropane;
67. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-chloroamphetamine;
68. 4-Methylethcathinone;
69. Pyrovalerone;
70. N,N-diallyl-5-methoxytryptamine;
71. 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-ethylcathinone (Ethylone);
72. B-keto-N-Methylbenzodioxolylbutanamine (Butylone);
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 8

73. B-keto-Methylbenzodioxolylpentanamine (Pentylone);
74. Alpha-Pyrrolidinopentiophenone;
75. 4-Fluoroamphetamine;
76. Pentedrone;
77. 4’-Methyl-a-pyrrolidinohexaphenone;
78. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenethylamine;
79. 2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine;
80. 1,4-Dibenzylpiperazine;
81. N,N-Dimethylamphetamine;
82. 4-Fluoromethamphetamine;
83. 4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxy-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine
(25C-NBOMe);
84. 4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxy-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine
(25I-NBOMe);
85. 4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-N-(2-methoxybenzy)phenethylamine
(25B-NBOMe);
86. 1-(4-Fluorophenyl)piperazine;
87. Methoxetamine;
88. 3,4-dichloro-N[2-dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-
methylbenzamide;
89. N-ethyl hexadrone;
90. Isopropyl-U-47700;
91. Para-fluorobutyrl fentanyl;
92. Para-fluorofentanyl (pFF);
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 9

93. Fluoro isobutryrl fentanyl;
94. 3-Hydroxy Phencyclidine (PCP);
95. 3-methoxy Phencyclidine (PCP);
96. Flualprazolam; or
97. Flubromazolam.
D. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in a different
schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following substances having stimulant
or depressant effect on the central nervous system:
1. Fenethylline;
2. Mecloqualone;
3. N-ethylamphetamine;
4. Methaqualone;
5. Gamma-Hydroxybutyric Acid, also known as GHB, gamma-
hydroxybutyrate, 4-hydroxybutyrate, 4-hydroxybutanoic acid, sodium
oxybate, and sodium oxybutyrate;
6. Gamma-Butyrolactone (GBL) as packaged, marketed,
manufactured, or promoted for human consumption, with the exception
of legitimate food additive and manufacturing purposes;
7. Gamma Hydroxyvalerate (GHV) as packaged, marketed, or
manufactured for human consumption, with the exception of legitimate
food additive and manufacturing purposes;
8. Gamma Valerolactone (GVL) as packaged, marketed, or
manufactured for human consumption, with the exception of legitimate
food additive and manufacturing purposes;
9. 1,4 Butanediol (1,4 BD or BDO) as packaged, marketed,
manufactured, or promoted for human consumption with the exception
of legitimate manufacturing purposes; or
10. N-ethylpentylone;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 10

11. Adinazolam;
12. Meclonazepam;
13. N-methylclonazepam;
14. Bromazolam;
15. Flunitrazolam;
16. Nitrazolam;
17. Pyrazolam;
18. Zapizolam;
19. N-propionitrile chlorphine;
20. 5,6-dichloro desmethylchlorphine; or
21. Phenazolam.
E. 1. The following industrial uses of Gamma-Butyrolactone,
Gamma Hydroxyvalerate, Gamma Valerolactone, or 1,4 Butanediol are
excluded from all schedules of controlled substances under this
title:
a. pesticides,
b. photochemical etching,
c. electrolytes of small batteries or capacitors,
d. viscosity modifiers in polyurethane,
e. surface etching of metal coated plastics,
f. organic paint disbursements for water soluble inks,
g. pH regulators in the dyeing of wool and polyamide
fibers,
h. foundry chemistry as a catalyst during curing,
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 11

i. curing agents in many coating systems based on
urethanes and amides,
j. additives and flavoring agents in food, confectionary,
and beverage products,
k. synthetic fiber and clothing production,
l. tetrahydrofuran production,
m. gamma butyrolactone production,
n. polybutylene terephthalate resin production,
o. polyester raw materials for polyurethane elastomers
and foams,
p. coating resin raw material, and
q. as an intermediate in the manufacture of other
chemicals and pharmaceuticals.
2. At the request of any person, the Director of the Oklahoma
State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control may exempt any
other product containing Gamma-Butyrolactone, Gamma Hydroxyvalerate,
Gamma Valerolactone, or 1,4 Butanediol from being included as a
Schedule I controlled substance if such product is labeled,
marketed, manufactured, and distributed for legitimate industrial
use in a manner that reduces or eliminates the likelihood of abuse.
3. In making a determination regarding an industrial product,
the Director, after notice and hearing, shall consider the
following:
a. the history and current pattern of abuse,
b. the name and labeling of the product,
c. the intended manner of distribution, advertising, and
promotion of the product, and
d. other factors as may be relevant to and consistent
with the public health and safety.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 12

4. The hearing shall be held in accordance with the procedures
of the Administrative Procedures Act.
F. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation, whether
produced directly or indirectly from a substance of vegetable origin
or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination
of extraction and chemical synthesis, that contains any quantity of
the following substances, or that contains any of their salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers when the existence of these salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific
chemical designation:
1. JWH-004;
2. JWH-007;
3. JWH-009;
4. JWH-015;
5. JWH-016;
6. JWH-018;
7. JWH-019;
8. JWH-020;
9. JWH-030;
10. JWH-046;
11. JWH-047;
12. JWH-048;
13. JWH-049;
14. JWH-050;
15. JWH-070;
16. JWH-071;
17. JWH-072;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 13

18. JWH-073;
19. JWH-076;
20. JWH-079;
21. JWH-080;
22. JWH-081;
23. JWH-082;
24. JWH-094;
25. JWH-096;
26. JWH-098;
27. JWH-116;
28. JWH-120;
29. JWH-122;
30. JWH-145;
31. JWH-146;
32. JWH-147;
33. JWH-148;
34. JWH-149;
35. JWH-150;
36. JWH-156;
37. JWH-167;
38. JWH-175;
39. JWH-180;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 14

40. JWH-181;
41. JWH-182;
42. JWH-184;
43. JWH-185;
44. JWH-189;
45. JWH-192;
46. JWH-193;
47. JWH-194;
48. JWH-195;
49. JWH-196;
50. JWH-197;
51. JWH-198;
52. JWH-199;
53. JWH-200;
54. JWH-201;
55. JWH-202;
56. JWH-203;
57. JWH-204;
58. JWH-205;
59. JWH-206;
60. JWH-207;
61. JWH-208;
62. JWH-209;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 15

63. JWH-210;
64. JWH-211;
65. JWH-212;
66. JWH-213;
67. JWH-234;
68. JWH-235;
69. JWH-236;
70. JWH-237;
71. JWH-239;
72. JWH-240;
73. JWH-241;
74. JWH-242;
75. JWH-243;
76. JWH-244;
77. JWH-245;
78. JWH-246;
79. JWH-248;
80. JWH-249;
81. JWH-250;
82. JWH-251;
83. JWH-252;
84. JWH-253;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 16

85. JWH-262;
86. JWH-292;
87. JWH-293;
88. JWH-302;
89. JWH-303;
90. JWH-304;
91. JWH-305;
92. JWH-306;
93. JWH-307;
94. JWH-308;
95. JWH-311;
96. JWH-312;
97. JWH-313;
98. JWH-314;
99. JWH-315;
100. JWH-316;
101. JWH-346;
102. JWH-348;
103. JWH-363;
104. JWH-364;
105. JWH-365;
106. JWH-367;
107. JWH-368;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 17

108. JWH-369;
109. JWH-370;
110. JWH-371;
111. JWH-373;
112. JWH-386;
113. JWH-387;
114. JWH-392;
115. JWH-394;
116. JWH-395;
117. JWH-397;
118. JWH-398;
119. JWH-399;
120. JWH-400;
121. JWH-412;
122. JWH-413;
123. JWH-414;
124. JWH-415;
125. CP-55, 940;
126. CP-47, 497;
127. HU-210;
128. HU-211;
129. WIN-55, 212-2;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 18

130. AM-2201;
131. AM-2233;
132. JWH-018 adamantyl-carboxamide;
133. AKB48;
134. JWH-122 N-(4-pentenyl)analog;
135. MAM2201;
136. URB597;
137. URB602;
138. URB754;
139. UR144;
140. XLR11;
141. A-796,260;
142. STS-135;
143. AB-FUBINACA;
144. AB-PINACA;
145. PB-22;
146. AKB48 N-5-Fluorpentyl;
147. AM1248;
148. FUB-PB-22;
149. ADB-FUBINACA;
150. BB-22;
151. 5-Fluoro PB-22; or
152. 5-Fluoro AKB-48.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 19

G. In addition to those substances listed in subsection F of
this section, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
which contains any quantity of a synthetic cannabinoid found to be
in any of the following chemical groups:
1. Naphthoylindoles: any compound containing a 3-(1-
naphthoyl)indole structure with or without substitution at the
nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl,
alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-
(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on the indole
ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on the naphthyl
ring to any extent. Naphthoylindoles include, but are not limited
to:
a. 1-[2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl]-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-
200),
b. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (AM2201),
c. 1-pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-018),
d. 1-butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-073),
e. 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-081),
f. 1-propyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-015),
g. 1-hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-019),
h. 1-pentyl-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-122),
i. 1-pentyl-3-(4-ethyl-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-210),
j. 1-pentyl-3-(4-chloro-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-398),
k. 1-pentyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-007),
l. 1-pentyl-3-(7-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-164),
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 20

m. 1-pentyl-2-methyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole
(JWH-098),
n. 1-pentyl-3-(4-fluoro-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-412),
o. 1-[1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-3-(1-
naphthoyl)indole (AM-1220),
p. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole
(MAM-2201), or
q. 1-(4-cyanobutyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (AM-2232);
2. Naphthylmethylindoles: any compound containing a 1H-indol-
3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane structure with or without substitution at
the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl,
halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on
the indole ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on the
naphthyl ring to any extent. Naphthylmethylindoles include, but are
not limited to, (1-pentylindol-3-yl)(1-naphthyl)methane (JWH-175);
3. Naphthoylpyrroles: any compound containing a 3-(1-
naphthoyl)pyrrole structure with or without substitution at the
nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl,
halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on
the pyrrole ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on
the naphthyl group to any extent. Naphthoylpyrroles include, but
are not limited to:
a. 1-hexyl-2-phenyl-4-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole (JWH-147),
b. 1-pentyl-5-(2-methylphenyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole
(JWH-370),
c. 1-pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole (JWH-030), or
d. 1-hexyl-5-phenyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole (JWH-147);
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 21

4. Naphthylideneindenes: any compound containing a 1-(1-
naphthylmethylene)indene structure with or without substitution at
the 3-position of the indene ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl,
halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on
the indene group to any extent, and whether or not substituted on
the naphthyl group to any extent. Naphthylmethylindenes include,
but are not limited to, (1-[(3-pentyl)-1H-inden-1-
ylidene)methyl]naphthalene (JWH-176);
5. Phenylacetylindoles: any compound containing a 3-
phenylacetylindole structure with or without substitution at the
nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl,
alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-
(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on the indole
ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on the phenyl
ring to any extent. Phenylacetylindoles include, but are not
limited to:
a. 1-pentyl-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole (JWH-250),
b. 1-(2-cyclohexylethyl)-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole
(RCS-8),
c. 1-pentyl-3-(2-chlorophenylacetyl)indole (JWH-203),
d. 1-pentyl-3-(2-methylphenylacetyl)indole (JWH-251),
e. 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole (JWH-201), or
f. 1-pentyl-3-(3-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole (JWH-302);
6. Cyclohexylphenols: any compound containing a 2-(3-
hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol structure with or without substitution at
the 5-position of the phenolic ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl,
halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 22

morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, and whether or not further substituted
on the cyclohexyl ring to any extent. Cyclohexylphenols include,
but are not limited to:
a. 5-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-2-[(1R,3S)-3-
hydroxycyclohexyl]-phenol (CP-47,497),
b. 5-(1,1-dimethyloctyl)-2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-
phenol (cannabicyclohexanol; CP-47,497 C8 homologue),
or
c. 5-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-2-[(1R,2R)-5-hydroxy-2-(3-
hydroxypropyl)cyclohexyl]-phenol (CP 55, 940);
7. Benzoylindoles: any compound containing a 3-(benzoyl)indole
structure with or without substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on the indole
ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on the phenyl
group to any extent. Benzoylindoles include, but are not limited
to:
a. 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxybenzoyl)indole (RCS-4),
b. 1-[2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl]-2-methyl-3-(4-
methoxybenzoyl)indole (Pravadoline or WIN 48, 098),
c. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole (AM-694),
d. 1-pentyl-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole (AM-679), or
e. 1-[1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-3-(2-
iodobenzoyl)indole (AM-2233);
8. Cyclopropoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-
(cyclopropoyl)indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen
atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 23

(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted in the indole
ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted in the
cyclopropoyl ring to any extent. Cyclopropoylindoles include, but
are not limited to:
a. 1-pentyl-3-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole
(UR-144),
b. 1-(5-chloropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3-
tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole (5Cl-UR-144), or
c. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3-
tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole (XLR11);
9. Indole Amides: Any compound containing a 1H-Indole-3-
carboxamide structure with or without substitution at the nitrogen
atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not substituted at the carboxamide
group by an adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl, benzyl, quinolinyl,
cycloalkyl, 1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-
1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3,3-
dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl or pyrrole group, and whether or not
further substituted in the indole, adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl,
pyrrole, quninolinyl, or cycloalkyl rings to any extent. Indole
Amides include, but are not limited to:
a. N-(1-adamantyl)-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide
(2NE1),
b. N-(1-adamantyl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl-1H-indole-3-
carboxamide (STS-135),
c. N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-
indole-3-carboxamide (ADBICA),
d. N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-
fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide (5F-ADBICA),
e. N-(naphthalen-1-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide
(NNE1),
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 24

f. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(naphthalene-1-yl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxamide (5F-NNE1),
g. N-benzyl-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide (SDB-006),
or
h. N-benzyl-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide
(5F-SDB-006);
10. Indole Esters: Any compound containing a 1H-Indole-3-
carboxylate structure with or without substitution at the nitrogen
atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not substituted at the carboxylate
group by an adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl, benzyl, quinolinyl,
cycloalkyl, 1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-
1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3,3-
dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl or pyrrole group, and whether or not
further substituted in the indole, adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl,
pyrrole, quinolinyl, or cycloalkyl rings to any extent. Indole
Esters include, but are not limited to:
a. quinolin-8-yl 1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxylate (PB-
22),
b. quinolin-8-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxylate (5F-PB-22),
c. quinolin-8-yl 1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxylate (BB-22),
d. naphthalen-1-yl 1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxylate (FDU-PB-22), or
e. naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxylate (NM2201);
11. Adamantanoylindoles: Any compound containing an
adamantanyl-(1H-indol-3-yl)methanone structure with or without
substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 25

benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted in
the indole ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted in the
adamantyl ring to any extent. Adamantanoylindoles include, but are
not limited to:
a. adamantan-1-yl[1-[(1-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-1H-
indol-3-yl]methanone (AM1248), or
b. adamantan-1-yl-(1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)methanone (AB-
001);
12. Carbazole Ketone Ketones: Any compound containing (9H-
carbazole-3-yl) methanone structure with or without substitution at
the nitrogen atom of the carbazole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl,
halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, with substitution at the carbon of the
methanone group by an adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl, benzyl,
quinolinyl, cycloalkyl, 1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-amino-
3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-
methoxy-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl or pyrrole group, and whether
or not further substituted at the carbazole, adamantyl, naphthyl,
phenyl, pyrrole, quinolinyl, or cycloalkyl rings to any extent.
Carbazole Ketones include, but are not limited to, naphthalen-1-
yl(9-pentyl-9H-carbazol-3-yl)methanone (EG-018);
13. Benzimidazole Ketone Ketones: Any compound containing
(benzimidazole-2-yl) methanone structure with or without
substitution at either nitrogen atom of the benzimidazole ring by an
alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, with substitution at the carbon of the methanone
group by an adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl, benzyl, quinolinyl,
cycloalkyl, 1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-
1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3,3-
dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl or pyrrole group, and whether or not
further substituted in the benzimidazole, adamantyl, naphthyl,
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 26

phenyl, pyrrole, quinolinyl, or cycloalkyl rings to any extent.
Benzimidazole Ketones include, but are not limited to:
a. naphthalen-1-yl(1-pentyl-1H-benzo[d]imidazol-2-
l)methanone (JWH-018 benzimidazole analog), or
b. (1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-benzo[d]imidazol-2-
yl)(naphthalen-1-yl)methanone (FUBIMINA); and
14. Modified by Replacement: any compound defined in this
subsection that is modified by replacement of a carbon with nitrogen
in the indole, naphthyl, indene, benzimidazole, or carbazole ring.
H. Any prescription drug approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration under the provisions of Section 505 of the Federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, Title 21 of the United States Code 21
U.S.C., Section 355, that is designated, rescheduled, or deleted as
a controlled substance under federal law by the United States Drug
Enforcement Administration shall be excluded from Schedule I and
shall be prescribed, distributed, dispensed, or used in accordance
with federal law upon the issuance of a notice, final rule, or
interim final rule by the United States Drug Enforcement
Administration designating, rescheduling, or deleting as a
controlled substance such a drug product under federal law, unless
and until the State Board of Pharmacy takes action pursuant to
Section 2-201 of this title. If the State Board of Pharmacy does
not take action pursuant to Section 2-201 of this title, the drug
product shall be deemed to be designated, rescheduled, or deleted as
a controlled substance in accordance with federal law and in
compliance with the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-210, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-210. A. Any material, compound, mixture, or
preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances
having a potential for abuse associated with a stimulant or
depressant effect on the central nervous system:
1. Chloral betaine;
2. Chloral hydrate;
3. Ethchlorvynol;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 27

4. Ethinamate;
5. Meprobamate;
6. Paraldehyde;
7. Petrichloral;
8. Diethylpropion;
9. Phentermine;
10. Pemoline;
11. Chlordiazepoxide;
12. Chlordiazepoxide and its salts, but not including
chlordiazepoxide hydrochloride and clidinium bromide or
chlordiazepoxide and water-soluble esterified estrogens;
13. Diazepam;
14. Oxazepam;
15. Clorazepate;
16. Flurazepam and its salts;
17. Clonazepam;
18. Barbital;
19. Mebutamate;
20. Methohexital;
21. Methylphenobarbital;
22. Phenobarbital;
23. Fenfluramine;
24. Pentazocine;
25. Propoxyphene;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 28

26. Butorphanol;
27. Alprazolam;
28. Halazepam;
29. Lorazepam;
30. Prazepam;
31. Temazepam;
32. Triazolam;
33. Carisoprodol;
34. Dichloralphenazone;
35. Estazolam;
36. Eszopiclone;
37. Midazolam;
38. Modafinil;
39. Zaleplon;
40. Zolpidem;
41. Tramadol;
42. Bromazepam;
43. Suvorexant;
44. Phenazepam;
45. Etizolam; or
46. Clonazolam;
47. Lormetazepam; or
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 29

48. Nifoxipam.
B. 1. The following nonnarcotic substances, which may, under
the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21, 21 U.S.C., Section
301) 301 et seq., be lawfully sold over the counter without a
prescription, are excluded from all schedules of controlled
substances under this title:
a. Breathe-Aid,
b. BronCare,
c. Bronchial Congestion,
d. Bronkaid Tablets,
e. Bronkaid Dual Action Caplets,
f. Bronkotabs,
g. Bronkolixir,
h. NeoRespin,
i. Pazo Hemorrhoid Ointment and Suppositories,
j. Primatene Tablets,
k. Primatene “Dual Action” Formula,
l. Quelidrine,
m. Resp, and
n. Vatronal Nose Drops.
2. At the request of any person, the Director of the Oklahoma
State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control may exempt any
other drug product containing ephedrine from being included as a
Schedule IV controlled substance if such product:
a. is labeled and marketed in a manner consistent with
the pertinent OTC tentative final or final monograph
issued by the FDA United States Food and Drug
Administration (FDA), and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 30

b. is manufactured and distributed for legitimate
medicinal use and in a manner that reduces or
eliminates the likelihood of abuse.
3. In making a determination regarding a drug product, the
Director, after notice and hearing, shall consider the following:
a. the history and current pattern of abuse,
b. the name and labeling of the product,
c. the intended manner of distribution, advertising, and
promotion of the product, and
d. other factors as may be relevant to and consistent
with the public health and safety.
4. The hearing shall be held in accordance with the
Administrative Procedures Act.
5. A list of current drug products meeting exemption
requirements under this subsection may be obtained from the Oklahoma
State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control upon written
request.
C. The State Board of Pharmacy may except by rule any compound,
mixture, or preparation containing any depressant substance listed
in subsection A of this section from the application of all or any
part of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, Section 2-
101 et seq. of this title, if the compound, mixture, or preparation
contains one or more active medicinal ingredients not having a
depressant effect on the central nervous system, and if the
admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity,
proportion, or concentration that vitiate the potential for abuse of
the substances which have a depressant effect on the central nervous
system.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-309B, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 69, O.S.L. 2022 (63 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 2-309B), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-309B. For the purposes of the Anti-Drug Diversion
Act:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 31

1. “Bureau” means the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and
Dangerous Drugs Control;
2. “Dispenser” means a person who distributes a Schedule II,
III, IV, or V controlled dangerous substance, but does not include a
licensed hospital pharmacy or a licensed nurse or medication aide
who administers such a substance at the direction of a licensed
physician;
3. “Dispenser’s registration number” means the dispenser’s
Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control
registration number or, in the case of a pharmacist, the National
Association of Boards of Pharmacy number for the pharmacy where the
dispensation is made;
4. “Exception report” means an output of data indicating
Schedule II controlled dangerous substance dispensation which is
outside expected norms for a prescriber practicing a particular
specialty or field of health care, for a dispenser doing business in
a particular location, or for a recipient;
5. “Recipient” means the person for whom a prescription is
prescribed and who is the lawful intended ultimate user;
6. “Recipient’s agent” means a person who is authorized by the
ultimate user to pick up the recipient’s medication and deliver it
to the recipient or a person who claims a prescription other than
the person to whom the medication is prescribed;
7. “Recipient’s identification number” and “recipient’s agent’s
identification number” means mean the unique number contained on
forms of identification either listed in 8 CFR C.F.R., Section
274a.2(b)(1)(v)(A) and (B) or as otherwise listed in the rules of
the Bureau;
8. “Registrant” means a person, persons, corporation or other
entity who has been issued by the Director of the Oklahoma State
Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control a registration
pursuant to Section 2-302 of this title; and
9. “State” means any state, territory, or possession of the
United States, the District of Columbia, or foreign nation.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 32

Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3767 Page 33